Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 2. State Parks.

Administrative Code. —

For state park land and water, see 11 AAC 20.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares and Playgrounds, §§ 1, 2, 4-12

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, § 56.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 251, 259-264.

Sec. 41.21.110.
Purpose of AS 41.21.110 — 41.21.113.

The purpose of AS

41.21.110

—

41.21.113

is to empower the governor to restrict state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.111

to use as a state park.
Under AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature.
Because the area described in AS

41.21.111

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.110

—

41.21.113

are intended to provide for the closing of the described land and water to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and its subsequent designation as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, § 7, of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.170. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.111.
Authority to designate Chilkat State Park.

The governor may designate by proclamation the state-owned land and water and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the parcels described in this section, as the Chilkat State Park. The proclamation may include the entire area or portions of the area at different times, shall reserve the areas included from all uses incompatible with their primary function as public recreation land and water, and shall assign them to the department for control, development, and maintenance. Land covered by AS

41.21.110

—

41.21.113

has a total acreage of 6,056.30 acres, including approximately 610 acres of federal land, and is described as follows:

Township 31 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 59 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 32 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

the following particularly described parcels:

approximately 6.49 acres in U.S. Survey 1243, Haines Recording District, described as: begin on the South line of said survey South 88 degrees 31 minutes 45 seconds East 1950.84 feet from Southwest corner (corner 4 M.C.) of said survey, said point being the Southeast corner of the tract in said survey excepted in the decree in Case No. 68-328 of the Superior Court at Juneau, in which the distance is recited as being 29.55 chains (1950.30 feet), run thence North 01 degree 12 minutes 00 seconds East, on the East line of said excepted tract, 1028.77 feet, recited as 15.59 chains (1028.94 feet) in said decree, to the Northeast corner of said excepted tract; thence North 88 degrees 31 minutes 45 seconds West 24.38 feet; thence North 01 degree 27 minutes 45 seconds East 1.85 feet; thence on a 126.92 foot radius curve to the left through a central angle of 72 degrees 04 minutes 30 seconds a distance of 159.57 feet, the chord of which bears North 34 degrees 34 minutes 30 seconds West 149.27 feet; thence North 70 degrees 25 minutes 15 seconds West 119.52 feet; thence on a 208.11 foot radius curve to the right through a central angle of 62 degrees 04 minutes 00 seconds a distance of 225.48 feet, the chord of which bears North 39 degrees 23 minutes 15 seconds West 214.61 feet to the South line of “Mud Bay Road”; thence North 86 degrees 46 minutes 30 seconds East, on said line of “Mud Bay Road,” 230.54 feet; thence South 70 degrees 25 minutes 15 seconds East 90.95 feet; thence on a 326.92 foot radius curve to the right through a central angle of 71 degrees 57 minutes 00 seconds a distance of 410.55 feet, the chord of which bears South 34 degrees 30 minutes 45 seconds 384.10 feet; thence South 01 degree 27 minutes 45 seconds West 1030.62 feet to the South line of said survey; thence North 88 degrees 31 minutes 45 seconds West 175.38 feet to the point of beginning;

approximately 92 acres in Tract “D,” C. McRae Subdivision according to Plat 77-12, Haines Recording District, described as: begin at the Southwest corner of said Tract “D” which is also the Southwest corner of the North one-half of the Southwest one-quarter of the Northwest one-quarter of Section 32, Township 31 South, Range 60 East of the Copper River Meridian, which bears North 01 degree 26 minutes 00 seconds West (Alaska State Plane Grid Bearings) 660.00 feet from the one-quarter corner on the West line of said section and South 01 degree 26 minutes 00 seconds East 660.00 feet from the North one-sixteenth corner on the West line of said section, run thence North 01 degree 26 minutes 00 seconds East, on the West line of said section, 347.81 feet to the Northeasterly line of Chilkat State Park Roadway; thence South 32 degrees 56 minutes 15 seconds East 70.04 feet to a point of curve; thence Southerly on a 0 degrees 58 minutes 58 seconds curve to the right (Radius = 5,829.65 feet) through an arc of 03 degrees 23 minutes 12 seconds (344.58 feet), the chord of which bears South 31 degrees 14 minutes 45 seconds East 344.53 feet, to the South line of said tract and the South line of the North one-half of the Southwest one-quarter of the Northwest one-quarter of said section; thence North 88 degrees 34 minutes 00 seconds West 225.56 feet to the point of beginning;

approximately 3.44 acres in Tract “E,” C. McRae Subdivision according to Plat 77-12, Haines Recording District, described as: begin at the Northwest corner of said tract which is also the one-sixty-fourth corner on the West line of said section which bears North 01 degree 26 minutes 00 seconds East (Alaska State Plane Grid Bearings) 660.00 feet from the one-quarter corner on the West line of Section 32, Township 31 South, Range 60 East of the Copper River Meridian and South 01 degree 26 minutes 00 seconds West 660.00 feet from the North one-sixteenth corner of said section, run thence South 88 degrees 34 minutes 00 seconds East, on the North line of said tract which is also the South line of the North one-half of the Southwest one-quarter of the Northwest one-quarter of said section, 225.56 feet to a point on the Easterly line of Chilkat State Park Roadway; thence Southerly on a 0 degrees 58 minutes 58 seconds curve to the right (Radius = 5,829.65 feet) through an arc of 01 degree 46 minutes 48 seconds (181.10 feet), the chord of which bears South 28 degrees 39 minutes 39 seconds East 181.10 feet, to a point of tangency; thence South 27 degrees 46 minutes 15 seconds East 268.21 feet to a point of curve; thence on a 14 degrees 16 minutes 06 seconds curve to the right (Radius = 401.56) through an arc of 40 degrees 06 minutes 37 seconds (281.12 feet), the chord of which bears South 07 degrees 43 minutes 00 seconds East 275.41 feet to the South line of said tract which is also the South line of the Southwest one-quarter of the Northwest one-quarter of said section; thence North 88 degrees 15 minutes 00 seconds West, on said South line, to the Westerly line of Chilkat State Park Roadway; thence Northerly on a 28 degrees 25 minutes 34 seconds curve to the left (Radius = 201.56 feet) through an arc of 50 degrees 59 minutes 51 seconds (179.40 feet), the chord of which bears North 02 degrees 15 minutes 15 seconds West 173.54 feet to a point of tangency; thence North 27 degrees 46 minutes 15 seconds West 268.21 feet to a point of curve; thence on a 01 degree 01 minute 04 seconds curve to the left (Radius = 5,629.65 feet) through an arc of 02 degrees 50 minutes 00 seconds (278.39 feet), the chord of which bears North 29 degrees 11 minutes 15 seconds West 278.37 feet to the West line of said section; thence North 01 degree 26 minutes 00 seconds East 14.72 feet to the point of beginning.

U.S.S. 1599: the portions of Sections 6-8 known as Battery Point Light House Reserve;

Section 1, excluding the portions of Lots 2 and 3 within the Chilkoot Inlet Alaska Subdivision

Section 12: NW1/4, NE1/4, SE1/4

Township 31 South, Range 60 East, Copper River Meridian

Section 6: Lots 1-3

Section 7: Lots 1-7

Section 8: Lot 1

Sections 17 and 18

Section 19: NE1/4NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4;

Section 30: Lots 8 and 9

Section 31

Section 32: SW1/4, W1/2NW1/4SE1/4,

W1/2SE1/4NW1/4SE1/4, Lots 9 — 16 including

W1/2SW1/4SE1/4SE1/4;

Section 5: W1/2, W1/2SE1/4

Sections 6-9, 15-17, 21 and 22, excluding Tongass National Forest; and

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 47 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.180. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Chilkat state park and Point Bridget state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 12.

Sec. 41.21.112.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Chilkat State Park in accordance with AS

41.21.110

, and those incompatible uses designated shall be prohibited or restricted, as provided by regulation.
Nothing in this section affects the rights and uses of water and facilities of the city of Haines located within the boundaries of this area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.190. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.113.
Eminent domain prohibited.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land for inclusion in Chilkat State Park.

History.

(§ 4 ch 47 SLA 1975)

Sec. 41.21.120.
Purpose of AS 41.21.120 — 41.21.125.

The purpose of AS

41.21.120

—

41.21.125

is to restrict state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.121

to use as a state park. Under AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature.
Because the area described in AS

41.21.121

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.120

—

41.21.125

are intended to provide for the closing of the described land and water to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and its subsequent designation as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, § 7, of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.200. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.121.
Chugach State Park established.

The presently state-owned land and water, and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the parcels described in this section are designated as the Chugach State Park.
The park is established to protect and supply a satisfactory water supply for the use of the people, to provide recreational opportunities for the people by providing areas for specified uses and constructing the necessary facilities in those areas, to protect areas of unique and exceptional scenic value, to provide areas for the public display of local wildlife, and to protect the existing wilderness characteristics of the easterly interior area.
The eastern area of the park shall be operated as a wilderness area, the central area as a scenic area, and the periphery areas as recreational areas.
The land and water designated as the Chugach State Park and reserved from all uses incompatible with its primary function as a state park is that within the following described parcels excluding valid entries:

Township 11 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 14 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian, except lands covered by PLO 2029;

Township 13 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 14 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 11 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 12 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 13 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 14 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 16 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 10 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 13 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 14 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 15 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 3 East, except Chugach National Forest;

Township 12 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 13 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 14 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 15 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian.

Section 10: Lots 19 — 22, 24, 25, 28, 29, 33, 34, 37; and SE1/4, and E1/2 SW1/4

Section 14: SW1/4

Sections 15, 22, 23, 25 and 26

Section 24: S1/2 and NE1/4;

Sections 1 — 4;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: Lots 1 — 4, and S1/2N1/2, SE1/4, NW1/4 SW1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, and SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 5: Lots 1, 2, 4, and S1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, W1/2 SW1/4 and SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 7: E1/2 NE1/4 and SE1/4

Section 8: S1/2, NW1/4, and N1/2 NE1/4

Section 9: N1/2 N1/2, SW1/4, and S1/2 SE1/4

Section 10 — 17

Section 18: Lot 4; and NE1/4, SE1/4, and E1/2 SW1/4

Section 19, except Lot 1 USS 4909.

Section 20, except Lot 2 USS 4909.

Sections 21 — 26

Section 27: E1/2, NW1/4, and SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 28: NE1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4, and E1/2 SW1/4

Sections 29 — 32

Section 33 except USS 2891 and USS 3384

Sections 34 — 36;

Section 3: W1/2, SE1/4, and SW1/4 NE1/4

Sections 4, 5, and 7 — 10

Section 11: SW1/4, W1/2 NW1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, and SW1/4 SE1/4

Section 13: SW1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4, and SW1/4 SE1/4

Sections 14 — 29

Section 31: S1/2 SE1/4 and SE1/4 NE1/4

Sections 32 — 36;

Section 11: Lots 74 and 75

Section 13

Section 14: Lots 1 — 3, 13 — 16, 31, 32; and NE1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4, and SW1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4

Section 24: N1/2 N1/2;

Sections 1 — 4

Section 5, except USS 3215 and Indian Valley Subdivision

Section 6, except USS 1868 and USS 3200

Section 8

Section 9, except USS 3680, USS 3382, and USS 1069

Section 10, except USS 3201, USS 3202, and USS 3382

Sections 11 — 14 and 23 — 25

USS 3680: Lot 1;

Sections 1 — 30

Section 31, except USS 3200, USS 1868 and First Addition Indian Valley Subdivision

Sections 32 — 36;

Sections 1 — 4

Section 5: Lots 1 — 4; and S1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4 NW1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4 NW1/4, E1/2 SW1/4 SW1/4 NW1/4, E1/2 SE1/4, and N1/2 NW1/4 SE1/4

Section 6: Lots 1 — 3

Section 9: E1/2

Sections 10 — 13

Section 14 N1/2, E1/2 SE1/4, and N1/2 SW1/4

Section 15: NE1/4, N1/2 NW1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4, and SW1/4 SW1/4

Section 16: SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4, and NW1/4 SE1/4

Section 17: S1/2

Section 18: S1/2

Section 19: N1/2 N1/2

Section 20: N1/2 and SW1/4

Section 21, except NW1/4 SW1/4

Section 22, except E1/2 NE1/4

Section 23: SW1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4, and S1/2 SE1/4 SE1/4

Section 24: N1/2 E1/2 SE1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4, W1/2 SW1/4 SW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 SW1/4 SW1/4 SW1/4, and W1/2 NW1/4 SW1/4

Section 25: S1/2 except N1/2 NE1/4 NE1/4 SE1/4; and SW1/4 SW1/4 NE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4 NE1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4 SW1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4, NW1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4 NW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 NE1/4 NW1/4, and SW1/4 NW1/4 NE1/4 NW1/4

Sections 26 — 36;

Section 1

Section 2: SE1/4

Section 11: E1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, and SW1/4 NW1/4

Sections 12 and 13

Section 14: S1/2, NE1/4, E1/2 NW1/4, and SW1/4 NW1/4

Section 15: SE1/4 and S1/2 NE1/4

Sections 21 — 28

Section 29: E1/2, E1/2 SW1/4, and SW1/4 SW1/4

Section 31: E1/2 and E1/2 SW1/4

Section 32: N1/2, E1/2 SE1/4, and S1/2 SW1/4

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 25: NE1/4SE1/4SE1/4 and N1/2SE1/4SE1/4SE1/4; and Tract B, Thunderbird Heights Subdivision, as shown on Plat 77-226, Anchorage Recording District, October 10, 1977;

Sections 1 — 29

Section 30: Lots 2, 4; and N1/2, N1/2 SE1/4, N1/2 SE1/4 SE1/4, N1/2 NE1/4 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 SW1/4 SE1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 NW1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4, and NW1/4 NW1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4

Section 31: Lots 1, 2, 3, 5; and E1/2 W1/2, SE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 NW1/4, NE1/4, W1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4 NW1/4 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4, and SW1/4 SE1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4

Section 32: N1/2 NE1/4, W1/2 SE1/4 NE1/4, NE1/2 SE1/4 NE1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 NE1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4, W1/2 NW1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4 SW1/4 SE1/4, W1/2 SW1/4 NW1/4 SE1/4 SE1/4, S1/2 NW1/4 SW1/4, NW1/4 NW1/4 SW1/4, W1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4 SW1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4 NW1/4 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4 SW1/4 NW1/4, and W1/2 SE1/4 SW1/4 NW1/4

Section 33: N1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4, and N1/2 NW1/4 NW1/4

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 26 — 29 and 31 — 36

Section 30: SW1/4 SW1/4;

Sections 4 — 6, except Chugach National Forest

Section 7

Section 8: W1/2, W1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4, and N1/2 SE1/4 NE1/4, except USS 3045

Section 9: N1/2

Section 18: N1/2 and SW1/4, except USS 3043 and USS 3042;

Sections 1 — 7, 18, 19, 30, and 31, except Chugach National Forest;

Sections 1 — 4, 6, 7, and 10 — 36

Section 9: E1/2;

Section 1: S1/2 except USS 3527, USS 3914, USS 4789, and USS 3282

Sections 2 and 9 — 11: that portion south of the Glenn Highway

Sections 12 — 16

Section 17: that portion of the E1/2 south of the Glenn Highway

Section 19: S1/2

Section 20: NE1/4

Sections 21 — 28

Sections 30 and 31

Sections 33 — 36;

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 39 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 41.20.210. Renumbered in 1983. In 1970, “E21/2W1/2” was substituted for “E1/2S1/2” near the beginning of the description of land in Section 31 in paragraph (17) of this section to correct a manifest clerical error in ch. 112, SLA 1970.

Cross references. —

For 1974 modifications to the boundaries of the park under AS

41.21.122

, see the revisor’s notes to that section; for legislative purposes and findings in connection with the 1987 amendment to paragraph (12), see § 1, ch. 39, SLA 1987 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision authorizing land transfers and conveyances by the commissioner of natural resources affecting relocation or widening of the Seward Highway or relocation of facilities of the Alaska Railroad Corporation within the Chugach State Park, see sec. 6, ch. 116, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary & Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Chugach state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 39, ch. 91, SLA 1997 provides as follows: “Notwithstanding AS

41.21.120

—

41.21.125

, within Township 10 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian, the commissioner of natural resources may

“(1) convey a property interest in land to the Alaska Railroad Corporation for the purpose of realigning the railroad in conjunction with the relocation of the Seward Highway, provided that the property interest conveyed must be equivalent to that conveyed to the state-owned railroad under 45 U.S.C. 1201 — 1214 (Alaska Railroad Transfer Act of 1982) and shall be held and managed by the Alaska Railroad Corporation under AS 42.40;

“(2) grant a 300 foot wide highway easement to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the relocated Seward Highway;

“(3) grant a 100 foot wide utility easement to Chugach Electric Association, Inc., for the relocation of the 115 kilovolt electric transmission line (Federal Power Commission project no. 2170, AA-39417, and ADL 32417) and the electric distribution line (A-029885) located within the Chugach State Park.”

Sec. 41.21.122.
Management responsibility.

The state land and water described in AS

41.21.121

as the Chugach State Park is assigned to the department for control, development and maintenance, except that the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities is responsible for the repair and maintenance of all existing public roads within the park.
The control of highway access and roadside structures within the Chugach State Park is the responsibility of the department.
The Department of Fish and Game shall cooperate with the department to provide for those purposes under AS

41.21.121

relevant to the duties of the Department of Fish and Game.
If, in the exercise of management responsibility under this section, conflicts of land ownership, jurisdiction, or authority are unreconcilable or unmanageable other than at an unreasonable cost and expense to the state, the commissioner after public hearing in accordance with AS 44.62 may modify, subject to the approval of the legislature, the boundaries of the Chugach State Park not to exceed 20 percent of the total acreage described in AS 41.21.121.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.220. Renumbered in 1983. Under the authority of this section, the commissioner of natural resources held public hearings and modified the boundaries of the park. By adopting HCR 75 am in 1974, the legislature gave the required approval. The action removed the following land from the park: (1) land lying within the city limits of Girdwood in T10N, R2E, S.M.; (2) land in Sec. 10, T11N, R3W, S.M. south and west of and adjacent to the toe of the bluff that extends from Campbell Point southeasterly to Potter Creek that has been designated as the Potter Point State Game Refuge; (3) USS 3070 in Sec. 9, T16N, R2E, S.M., which is an isolated parcel of foreclosed land not contiguous to the park.

Sec. 41.21.123.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation, adopted in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Chugach State Park in accordance with AS

41.21.120

—

41.21.125

, and those incompatible uses designated are prohibited or restricted as provided by regulation.

In adopting regulations under this section and in complying with AS

44.62.210

, the commissioner shall provide the opportunity for the oral presentation of statements, arguments or contentions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.230(a) and (b). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.124.
Discharge of firearms. [Repealed, § 2 ch 126 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 41.21.125.
Purchase authorized.

The commissioner may acquire, by purchase in the name of the state, title to or interest in real property lying within or abutting the boundaries of the Chugach State Park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.240. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.130.
Purpose of AS 41.21.130 — 41.21.142.

The purpose of AS

41.21.130

—

41.21.142

is to restrict state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.131

to use as a state park. Under AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple purpose use only by act of the legislature.
Because the area described in AS

41.21.131

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.130

—

41.21.142

are intended to provide for the closing of the described land and water to multiple purpose use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and its subsequent designation as a special purpose site in accordance with art. VIII, § 7, of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.250. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.131.
Kachemak Bay State Park established.

The presently state-owned land and water, and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the parcels described in this section are designated as the Kachemak Bay State Park. In order to protect and preserve this land and water for its unique and exceptional scenic value, the park is established and shall be managed as a scenic park. The land and water lying within the following described parcels is reserved from all uses incompatible with its primary function as a scenic park and is assigned to the department for control, development, and maintenance:

Township 5 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian Chugachik Island

Township 5 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 6 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 7 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 7 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 8 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 8 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 9 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 8 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

The following public domain land shall be selected by the state, and classified as scenic park land and designated as part of Kachemak Bay State Park immediately upon receipt of management authority by the state:

Township 6 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian: W1/2;

Township 7 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian: W1/2;

Township 8 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Land lying within the parcels described in (a) and (b) of this section upon which there are valid entries or upon which there are valid applications for lease filed under AS 38.05 before May 9, 1970, is excepted from (a) and (b) of this section. However, if any land excepted under this subsection is subsequently relinquished to the state, it shall be included as part of Kachemak Bay State Park.

Sections 31 — 32;

Section 2: Lot 1, excluding Tract A

Section 3: Lots 1 — 8, SW1/4NE1/4, S1/2NW1/4, N1/2SW1/4

Section 4: Lots 1 — 4, S1/2N1/2, SE1/4, E1/2SW1/4

Section 8: E1/2NE1/4, SE1/4

Section 9: Lots 1 and 2, NW1/4NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4, W1/2NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4SW1/4, SW1/4NE1/4SW1/4, excluding Lot 6

Section 10: Lot 1

Section 16: Lot 1

Section 17: Lots 1, 3, 4, NW1/4SW1/4, S1/2NW1/4

Section 18: Lot 4, SE1/4, E1/2NE1/4

Section 19: Lots 1 — 6, NW1/4NE1/4, NE1/4NW1/4

Section 20: Lot 1

Sections 24 — 25, excluding tide and submerged land within the Kachemak Bay Critical Habitat Area

Section 26: SE1/4, excluding tide and submerged land within the Kachemak Bay Critical Habitat Area

Section 35, excluding tide and submerged land within the Kachemak Bay Critical Habitat Area

Section 36;

Sections 1 — 4

Section 5: N1/2

Sections 7 — 36;

Section 12, except N1/2NE1/4

Section 13

Sections 19 — 36;

Sections 25 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Sections 1 — 8

Section 9: N1/2

Section 10: N1/2

Section 11: N1/2

Section 12: N1/2

Sections 17 — 18;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 10 — 14

Section 15: E1/2

Section 23: N1/2 and SE1/4

Sections 24 — 25

Section 26: E1/2

Section 35: E1/2

Section 36;

Section 2: W1/2

Section 3 — 10

Sections 15 — 22

Sections 27 — 34;

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 22 — 27

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 1 — 6

Section 8: NE1/4

Sections 9 — 12

Section 13: N1/2

Section 14: N1/2;

Sections 1 — 2;

Sections 4 — 8

Sections 17 — 19;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 10 — 15

Sections 22 — 24.

Section 6

Section 7: N1/2.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 110 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly
AS 41.20.260. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Kachemak Bay state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 2.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 110, SLA 1989 provides:
“This Act does not prohibit the commissioner of natural resources from conveying 50 acres, more or less, on Nuka Island to the University of Alaska in accordance with the final finding of the commissioner of natural resources issued December 4, 1987, or its amendments.
This Act does not apply to land conveyed to the University of Alaska under the commissioner’s decision dated December 4, 1987.”

Sec. 41.21.132.
Incompatible uses.

The commissioner shall designate by regulation incompatible uses within the boundaries of the Kachemak Bay State Park in accordance with the requirements of AS

41.21.130

—

41.21.142

, and those incompatible uses designated shall be prohibited or restricted, as provided by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.270. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Kachemak Bay state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 2.

Sec. 41.21.133.
Discharge of firearms. [Repealed, § 2 ch 126 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 41.21.134.
Purchase authorized; eminent domain prohibited.

The commissioner may acquire, by purchase in the name of the state, title to or interest in real property lying within the boundaries of the Kachemak Bay State Park.
The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land for inclusion in the Kachemak Bay State Park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 115 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.290. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.140.
Kachemak Bay State Wilderness Park established.

The presently state-owned land and water, and all that acquired in the future by the state, lying within the parcels described in this section are designated as the Kachemak Bay State Wilderness Park. In order to protect and preserve this land and water for its unique and exceptional wilderness value, the park is established and shall be managed as a wilderness park. The land and water lying within the following described parcels is reserved from all uses incompatible with its primary function as a wilderness park and is assigned to the department for control and maintenance:

Township 8 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 13 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 9 West, Seward Meridian

Township 10 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 10 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 10 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 11 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 11 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian;

Township 11 South, Range 12 West, Seward Meridian

The following public domain land shall be selected by the state, and classified as wilderness park land and designated as part of Kachemak Bay State Park immediately upon receipt of management authority by the state:

Township 8 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian

Township 9 South, Range 10 West, Seward Meridian: W1/2;

Township 9 South, Range 11 West, Seward Meridian.

Section 9: S1/2

Section 10: S1/2

Section 11: S1/2

Section 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 16

Sections 19 — 36;

Sections 1 — 3;

Section 7

Section 8: S1/2 and NW1/4

Section 13: S1/2

Section 14: S1/2

Sections 15 — 36;

Section 11: NE1/4

Sections 12 — 13;

Sections 5 — 7;

Sections 1 — 10

Section 11: W1/2 and E1/2

Sections 12 — 17

Sections 21 — 24.

Sections 4 — 5

Section 7: S1/2

Sections 8 — 9

Sections 16 — 21

Sections 28 — 33;

History.

(§ 1 ch 82 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 110 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.261(a) and (b). Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For Kachemak Bay state wilderness park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 3.

Sec. 41.21.141.
Certain land excepted.

Land lying within the parcels described in AS

41.21.140

upon which there are valid entries or upon which there are valid applications for leases filed under AS 38.05 before March 9, 1972 or that is withdrawn for or selected by Native village or regional corporations under 43 U.S.C. 1610, 1611 and 1613 (P.L. 92-203, §§ 11, 12 and 14 of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), is excepted from AS

41.21.140

. However, if any land excepted under this subsection is subsequently relinquished to the state, it shall be included as part of Kachemak Bay State Wilderness Park.

History.

(§ 1 ch 82 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.261(c). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.142.
Stream rehabilitation permitted.

Nothing in AS

41.21.140

—

41.21.142

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in stream rehabilitation enhancement and development under AS

16.05.092

on land lying within the parcels described in AS

41.21.140

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 82 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.261(d). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.143.
Discharge of firearms. [Repealed, § 2 ch 126 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 41.21.150.
Purpose of AS 41.21.150 — 41.21.153.

The purpose of AS

41.21.150

—

41.21.153

is to restrict state-owned land and water described in AS

41.21.151

, except as provided in AS

41.21.153

, to use as a state park. Under AS

38.05.300

, state land, water, or land and water containing more than 640 acres may be closed to multiple use only by act of the legislature. Because the area described in AS

41.21.151

exceeds 640 acres, AS

41.21.150

— 41.21.153 are intended to provide for the closing of the land and water described in AS 41.21.151, as that description is modified by AS 41.21.153, to multiple use in conformity with AS

38.05.300

and its designation as a special purpose area in accord with art. VIII, sec. 7 of the Constitution of the State of Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 233 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.300. Renumbered in 1983.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 9, 2015, twice substituted “AS

41.21.150

-

41.21.153

” for “AS

41.21.150

-

41.21.152

”; in the first sentence, substituted “, except as provided in AS

41.21.153

,” preceding “to use as a state park”; in the third sentence, substituted “the land and water described in AS

41.21.151

, as that description is modified by AS 41.21.153,” for “the described land and water”.

Sec. 41.21.151.
Denali State Park established.

The state-owned land and water and that acquired in the future by the state lying within the parcels described in this section are designated as the Denali State Park.
This land and water is reserved from all uses incompatible with its primary function as park area.
Land covered by AS

41.21.150

—

41.21.152

is that within the following described parcels:

Township 29N Range 6W, Range 5W, and that portion of Range 4W lying north and west of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way; Township 30N Range 5W and that portion of Range 3W and 4W lying north and west of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way; Township 31N Range 5W, Range 4W and that portion of Range 3W and Range 2W lying north and west of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way; Township 32N Range 4W, Range 3W and that portion of Range 2W lying north and west of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way; and Township 33N Range 4W, Range 3W and that portion of Range 2W lying west of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way, all in the Seward Meridian;

Township 29N, Range 7W; Sections 1-27 and 34-36, Township 29N, Range 8W; containing approximately 42,240 acres, all in the Seward Meridian.

History.

(§ 2 ch 233 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 135 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.310. Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For authority of commission to adopt regulations designating incompatible uses, see AS

41.21.020(a)(6)

; for legislative declaration that a certain electrical transmission line is a compatible use in Denali State Park, see § 14, ch 118, SLA 1981.

Administrative Code. —

For Denali state park, see 11 AAC 20, art. 6.

Sec. 41.21.152.
Eminent domain prohibited.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land for inclusion in the Denali State Park.

History.

(§ 2 ch 233 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.320. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.153.
Certain land excepted.

Notwithstanding AS

41.21.020(a)(6)

,

41.21.150

, or

41.21.151

, state-owned land in the following described parcels may be leased in accordance with AS 38.35 (Right-of-Way Leasing Act) for the purpose of construction and operation of a natural gas pipeline from the North Slope:

Township 29 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 30 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 31 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 31 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 32 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 32 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 32 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 33 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 33 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

A state or federal survey does not remove land from the parcels described in (a) of this section.

The department shall manage any state-owned land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Denali State Park as part of Denali State Park until the land is leased under AS 38.35. State-owned land described in this section will revert to Denali State Park upon release of the land from a right-of-way through termination of the lease or otherwise and upon satisfaction of the lessee’s obligations to restore and revegetate the land.

Any right-of-way lease issued under AS 38.35 across land described in this section and within the exterior boundaries of Denali State Park must

reserve to the state the interests necessary to provide for public access by foot, snow machine, dog sled, and other traditional means of access along and across the leased corridor;

preserve, to the maximum extent practicable, the recreational, scenic, cultural, historical, and habitat values consistent with the leasehold’s location within the exterior boundaries of Denali State Park; and

provide for termination of the lease if construction of the pipeline has not begun 10 years after the effective date of the lease.

AS

38.35.130

does not apply to land within the exterior boundaries of Denali State Park.

A natural gas pipeline right-of-way lease may not be issued across land described in this section unless the lease becomes effective before January 1, 2025.

Section 4: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 5: E1/2

Section 7: E1/2, SW1/4

Section 8

Section 9: NW1/4

Section 18: E1/2

Section 19: E1/2

Section 29: SW1/4

Section 30: E1/2

Section 31: E1/2

Section 32: W1/2;

Section 2: NW1/4

Section 3

Section 4: SE1/4

Section 8: E1/2

Section 9

Section 10: W1/2

Section 16: W1/2

Section 17: E1/2

Section 20: E1/2

Section 21: W1/2

Section 28

Section 33;

Section 1: NW1/4, N1/2NE1/4

Section 2

Section 3: SE1/4

Section 9: SE1/4

Section 10

Section 11: W1/2

Section 14: NW1/4

Section 15: N1/2

Section 16

Section 17: S1/2

Section 19: NE1/4, S1/2

Section 20: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 21: NW1/4

Section 30: N1/2;

Section 24: SE1/4

Section 25

Section 26: E1/2

Section 34: SE1/4

Section 35

Section 36: NW1/4;

Section 6: NW1/4;

Section 1: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 2

Section 3: SE1/4

Section 8: SE1/4

Section 9

Section 10: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2SE1/4

Section 11: NW1/4

Section 16: N1/2

Section 17

Section 19: S1/2, NE1/4

Section 20: N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2SE1/4

Section 29: NW1/4

Section 30

Section 31: N1/2, SW1/4;

Section 25: SE1/4

Section 35: SE1/4

Section 36;

Section 16

Section 17: SE1/4

Section 20: NE1/4, S1/2, S1/2NW1/4

Section 21: W1/2

Section 29: N1/2, SW1/4

Section 30: S1/2, NE1/4

Section 31;

Section 36: S1/2.

History.

(§ 2 ch 12 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 12, SLA 2015, which enacted this section, took effect on August 9, 2015.